dictsource/chr_rules
//tones
.L01	xb xc xcxd xdxc xd xdxf xfxd xf

//nasal consonants
.L02	m n

//all consonants
.L03	ch d g h j k l m n s t w y

//all vowels
.L04 a e i o u v ạ ẹ ị ọ ụ ṿ

.replace
	¹ xb
	² xc
	³ xd
	⁴ xf
	ʔ ɂ

//CED pp xi-xii
.group x
	xb	1
	
	xc	2
	
	xcxd	23
	xdxc	32
	
	xd	3
	
	xdxf	34
	xfxd	43
	
	xf	4

//CED page x
.group ɂ
    ɂ ?
    
//CED - none of vowels are dipthongs, even though the pronunciation key uses dipthongs. pg ix - footnote

//CED pg ix
.group a
	//long
    a 0:
    L02) a 0~:
    
    //final word vowels are short, nasal, and have a highfall tone
    a (_ 0~43
    L02) a (_ 0~43
    axb (_	0~1
    axc (_	0~2
    axd (_	0~3
    axf (_	0~4
    
    a	(L03_	0~43
    a	(L03L03_	0~43
    a	(L03L03L03_	0~43
    
    a	(L03L01 0
    a	(L03L03L01 0
    a	(L03L03L03L01 0
    
    ah	(L01 0#
    ah	(L03L01 0#
    ah	(L03L03L01 0#
    ah	(L03L03L03L01 0#
    
.group e
    e	e:
    L02)	e	e~:
    
    e	(L03_	e43
    e	(L03L03_	e43
    e	(L03L03L03_	e43
    e	(L03L03L03L03_	e43

	//final word vowels are short, nasal, and have a highfall tone
    e	(_	e~43
    L02)	e	(_	e~43
    exb	(_	e~1
    exc	(_	e~2
    exd	(_	e~3
    exf	(_	e~4
    
    e	(L03L01 e
    e	(L03L03L01 e
    e	(L03L03L03L01 e

	L02)	e	(L03L01 e~
    L02)	e	(L03L03L01 e~
    L02)	e	(L03L03L03L01 e~
    
	eh	(L01 e#
    eh	(L03L01 e#
    eh	(L03L03L01 e#
    eh	(L03L03L03L01 e#

.group i
    i	i:
    L02)	i	i~:
    
	//final word vowels are short, nasal, and have a highfall tone    
    i	(_	i~43
    L02)	i	(_	i~43
    ixb	(_	i~1
    ixc	(_	i~2
    ixd	(_	i~3
    ixf	(_	i~4
    
    
    i	(L03_	i43
    i	(L03L03_	i43
    i	(L03L03L03_	i43
    
    i	(L03L01 i
    i	(L03L03L01 i
    i	(L03L03L03L01 i
    
    L02)	i	(L03L01 i~
    L02)	i	(L03L03L01 i~
    L02)	i	(L03L03L03L01 i~
    
	ih	(L01 i#
    ih	(L03L01 i#
    ih	(L03L03L01 i#
    ih	(L03L03L03L01 i#
    
.group o
    o	o:
    L02)	o	o~:
    
    o	(L03_	o43
    o	(L03L03_	o43
    o	(L03L03L03_	o43
    o	(L03L03L03L03_	o43

	//final word vowels are short, nasal, and have a highfall tone    
    o	(_	o~43
    L02)	o	(_	o~43
    oxb	(_	o~1
    oxc	(_	o~2
    oxd	(_	o~3
    oxf	(_	o~4
    
    o	(L03L01 o
    o	(L03L03L01 o
    o	(L03L03L03L01 o
    
    L02)	o	(L03L01 o~
    L02)	o	(L03L03L01 o~
    L02)	o	(L03L03L03L01 o~
    
	oh	(L01 o#
    oh	(L03L01 o#
    oh	(L03L03L01 o#
    oh	(L03L03L03L01 o#
        
.group u
    u	u:
    L02)	u	u~:
    
    u	(L03_	u43
    u	(L03L03_	u43
    u	(L03L03L03_	u43
    u	(L03L03L03L03_	u43
    
	//final word vowels are short, nasal, and have a highfall tone    
    u	(_	u~43
    L02)	u	(_	u~43
    uxb	(_	u~1
    uxc	(_	u~2
    uxd	(_	u~3
    uxf	(_	u~4
    
    u	(L03L01 u
    u	(L03L03L01 u
    u	(L03L03L03L01 u
    
    L02)	u	(L03L01 u~
    L02)	u	(L03L03L01 u~
    L02)	u	(L03L03L03L01 u~
    
	uh	(L01 u#
    uh	(L03L01 u#
    uh	(L03L03L01 u#
    uh	(L03L03L03L01 u#
        
.group v
    v	&~:
    
    v	(L03_	&~43
    v	(L03L03_	&~43
    v	(L03L03L03_	&~43
    
    v	(_	&~43
    vxb	(_	&~1
    vxc	(_	&~2
    vxd	(_	&~3
    vxf	(_	&~4
    
    v	(L03L01 &~
    v	(L03L03L01 &~
    v	(L03L03L03L01 &~
    
	vh	(L01 &~#
    vh	(L03L01 &~#
    vh	(L03L03L01 &~#
    vh	(L03L03L03L01 &~#

.group ạ
    ạ 0
    L02) ạ 0~
    ạ (_ 0~43
    
	ạh	(L01 0#
    ạh	(L03L01 0#
    ạh	(L03L03L01 0#
    ạh	(L03L03L03L01 0#    

.group ẹ
    ẹ e
    L02) ẹ e~
    ẹ (_ e~43
    
    ẹh	(L01 e#
    ẹh	(L03L01 e#
    ẹh	(L03L03L01 e#
    ẹh	(L03L03L03L01 e#
    
.group ị
    ị i
    L02) ị i~
    ị (_ i~43
    
    ịh	(L01 i#
    ịh	(L03L01 i#
    ịh	(L03L03L01 i#
    ịh	(L03L03L03L01 i#
    
    
.group ọ
    ọ o
    L02) ọ o~
    ọ (_ o~43
    
    ọh	(L01 o#
    ọh	(L03L01 o#
    ọh	(L03L03L01 o#
    ọh	(L03L03L03L01 o#
    
    
.group ụ
    ụ u
    L02) ụ u~
    ụ (_ u~43
    
    ụh	(L01 u#
    ụh	(L03L01 u#
    ụh	(L03L03L01 u#
    ụh	(L03L03L03L01 u#
    
    
.group ṿ
    ṿ &~
    ṿ (_ &~43
    
    ṿh	(L01 &~#
    ṿh	(L03L01 &~#
    ṿh	(L03L03L01 &~#
    ṿh	(L03L03L03L01 &~#
    

.group ch
    ch tS
    
.group d
    d d
    
.group g
    g g

.group h
    h h
    //if word ends in hn or hy, transpose the last two sounds. CED pg x footnote.
    hn (_ nh
    hn (L01_ nh
    hy (_ jh
    hy (L01_ jh
    
    // special handling for hl based on syllable boundaries
    _) hl l#
    hl (_ l#
    L01) hl l#
    hl (L01 l#
    hl (L03 l#
    L03) hl l#
    
.group j
     j dZ
     
.group k
     k k
     
.group l
     l l
     ls hls
     
.group m
     m m
    
.group n
     n n
     
.group s
     s s
     
.group t
     t t
     
	// special handling for tl based on syllable boundaries
    _) tl tl#
    tl (_ tl#
    L01) tl tl#
    tl (L01 tl#
    tl (L03 tl#
    L03) tl tl#
     
.group w
     w w
     wh (L01 w#
     wh (L03 w#
     wh (_ w#
     
.group y
     y j
     yh (L01 j
     yh (L03 j
     
